Hawaii, session 2026, GM1129.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
PART I
SECTION 1. The following sums or so much thereof as may be
necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 are appropriated out of the
general revenues of the State of Hawaii to the department of the
attorney general for the purpose of satisfying claims for
legislative relief as to the following named persons, firms,
corporations, and entities, for claims against the State or its
officers or employees, for the overpayment of taxes, or for
refunds, reimbursements, payments of judgments or settlements,
or other liabilities, in the amounts set forth opposite their
names:
JUDGMENTS AGAINST THE STATE AMOUNT
AND SETTLEMENTS OF CLAIMS:

1. MISCELLANEOUS CLAIMS:

Joan Arakawa and Kevin Arakawa $ 1,494.72

Steve Boucher and Judy Boucher $ 1,102.00

Citibank NA $ 780.72
HB2250 SD2 LRB 26-1234-1.docx
llllll«IIIIIU]lilUlliBII1lll

Page 2 H.B. NO.
^2
Silvia Frumento $ 1,425.12

Clarice H. Kam $ 724.11

Maria Lundblad $ 104,460.50

U.S. Department of the Treasury and the $ 1,223,732.22
Treasury Office of Inspector General (Reimbursement)
Reminding All Emergency Rental Assistance
Award Recipients of Responsibilities and
Requirements for Reporting Fraud and
Reimbursing Fraud Losses and Unallowable
Costs dated October 4, 2024

Melissa Gibo $ 97.74

Melissa Gibo $ 58.00

Melissa Gibo $ 521.25

Melissa Gibo $ 20.00

Estate of Ines Mandi $ 53,575.50

Linda S. Richburg $ 30,494.00

Spruce Servicing LLC $ 548,821.52

SUBTOTAL: $ 1,967,307.40

2. DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND BIOSECURITY:

United States Environmental Protection $ 151,132.00
Agency Region 9 v. State of Hawaii, (Settlement)
Department of Agriculture
EPA Docket No. UIC-09-2025-00XX

SUBTOTAL: $ 151,132.00

3. DEPARTMENT OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL:

HB2250 SD2 LRB 26-1234-1.docx

Page 3
H.B. NO.
Roynes J. Dural II v. State of Hawaii $ 420,833.00
Civil No. lCCV-21-0001461, First Circuit (Settlement)

Alvin F. Jardine, III v. State of Hawaii $ 600,000.00
Civil No. 2SP16-1-000056, Second Circuit (Settlement)

SUBTOTAL: $ 1,020,833.00

4. DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS AND REHABILITATION:

Judith M. Gatioan v. State of Hawaii $ 800,000.00
Civil No. lCCV-24-0001719, First Circuit (Settlement)

Susan O'Gorman v. State of Hawaii, $ 600,000.00
Department of Public Safety (Settlement)
Civil No. lCCV-24-0000912, First Circuit

SUBTOTAL: $ 1,400,000.00

DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION:

D.C. V. State of Hawaii, $ 400,000.00
Department of Education (Settlement)
Civil No. lCCV-20-0000657, First Circuit

DOE Parents v. State of Hawaii, $ 500,000.00
Department of Education (Settlement)
Civil No. lCCV-22-0001456, First Circuit

In the Matter of K.P. v. Department of $ 8,000,000.00
Education, State of Hawaii (Settlement)
Impartial Due Process
Hearing No. DOE-SY2425-041

Victoria Ramos v. Hawaii State $ 36,951.86
Department of Education (Settlement)
Civil No. 3CCV-23-0000394, Third Circuit

South Point Investment Group, LLC v. $ 100,000.00
State of Hawaii (Settlement)
Civil No. 3CCV-20-0000040, Third Circuit
HB2250 SD2 LRB 26-1234-1.docx

Page 4
H.B. NO. S’
h i

United Public Workers v. Keith Hayashi $ 75,000.00
Case No. CE-01-539 (Settlement)

SUBTOTAL: $ 9,111,951.86

6. DEPARTMENT OF HAWAIIAN HOME LANDS:

William Kaholoa'a Jr. v. Hawaiian Homes $ 1,330,000.00
Commission, State of Hawaii (Settlement)
Civil No. 2CCV-24-0000037, Second Circuit

SUBTOTAL: $ 1,330,000.00

7 . DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH:

HELG Administrative Services, LLC v. $ 100,000.00
Department of Health (Settlement)
Civil No. ICCl91000332, First Circuit

SUBTOTAL: $ 100,000.00

8. DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES:

Tera Graves v. State of Hawaii, $ 600,000.00
Department of Human Services (Settlement)
Civil No. 3CCV-19-0000022, Third Circuit

Hannah David v. State of Hawaii, $ 475,000.00
Civil No. 20-CV-00002-JMS-WRP, USDC (Settlement)

SUBTOTAL: $ 1,075,000.00

9. DEPARTMENT OF LAND AND NATURAL RESOURCES:

Lolita Silva v. Nelson Alana $ 2,000,000.00
Civil No. 2CC121000778, Second Circuit (Settlement)

SUBTOTAL: $ 2,000,000.00

HB2250 SD2 LRB 26-1234-1.docx

Page 5
H.B. NO.
10 . DEPARTMENT OF LAW ENFORCEMENT:

Thomas Cayetano v. $ 47,500.00
Department of Public Safety (Settlement)
Civil No. lCCV-22-0000179, First Circuit

SUBTOTAL: $ 47,500.00

11. OFFICE OF THE PUBLIC DEFENDER:

Joshua Spriestersbach v. Office of the $ 200,000.00
Public Defender (Settlement)
Civil No. lCCV-24-0000470, First Circuit

SUBTOTAL: $ 200,000.00

TOTAL (SECTION 1): $18,403,724.26
The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department
of the attorney general for the purposes of this Act.
PART II
SECTION 2. The following sums or so much thereof as may be
necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 are appropriated out of the
state highway fund for the purpose of satisfying claims for
legislative relief as to the following named persons, for claims
against the State or its officers or employees for payments of
judgments or settlements, or other liabilities, in the amount
set forth opposite their names:
HB2250 SD2 LRB 26-1234-1.docx

Page 6
H.B. NO.
JUDGMENTS AGAINST THE STATE AMOUNT
AND SETTLEMENTS OF CLAIMS;

DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION, HIGHWAYS DIVISION:

Anacleto R. Battad v. Lawrence J. Dill $ 1,100,000.00
Civil No. 5CC181000177, Fifth Circuit (Settlement)

Pualani Kanaka'ole Kanahele v. $ 68,186.76
State of Hawaii (Judgment)
Civil No. lCCV-20-0000235, First Circuit

The Estate of Matthew Louis Perreira v. $ 300,000.00
State of Hawaii (Settlement)
Civil No. 2CCV-22-0000045, Second Circuit

Cransten Takayama v. Aaron Napoleon $ 600,000.00
Civil No. lCCV-22-0000040, First Circuit (Settlement)
Shauntel Takayama v. Aaron Napoleon
Civil No. lCCV-22-0000110, First Circuit
Maximum Legal Services Corp. v. Aaron Napoleon
Civil No. lCCV-22-0000094, First Circuit
Donoven Ruiz v. Aaron Napoleon
Civil No. lCCV-22-0000109, First Circuit

SUBTOTAL: $ 2,068,186.76

TOTAL (SECTION 2) : $ 2,068,186.76
The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department
of transportation, highways division, for the purposes of this
Act.
HB2250 SD2 LRB 26-1234-1.docx 6
lllllllllllilllllllilllilllill

Page 7
H.B. NO.
PART III
SECTION 3. The sums hereinabove may be paid to the
respective persons, firms, corporations, or entities for the
satisfaction or settlement of the respectively identified cases,
and in several amounts hereinabove set forth or in lesser
amounts deemed appropriate, upon checks issued by the
comptroller; provided that departments shall obtain the approval
of the attorney general before payment of any claim may be made.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding the sums hereinabove stated as
interest upon judgments against the State, payment of interest
shall be limited to the period from the date of the judgment, if
applicable, to thirty days after the effective date of this Act,
as provided in section 662-8, Hawaii Revised Statutes, for those
cases to which the statute applies.
SECTION 5. The appropriations made by this Act shall not
lapse at the end of the fiscal period for which the
appropriations are made; provided that all moneys from the
appropriations that are unexpended and unencumbered as of June
30, 2027, shall lapse as of that date.
SECTION 6. If any provision of this Act, or the
application thereof to any person or circumstance, is held
HB2250 SD2 LRB 26-1234-1.docx 7
liinillHIIIIIIIINHilllH

Page 8
H.B. NO.
invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or
applications of the Act that can be given effect without the
invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions
of this Act are severable.
SECTION 7. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 8. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
HB2250 SD2 LRB 26-1234-1.docx 8
inilUIHHIIIilllH

H.B. NO.
APPROVED this 22nd day of May , 2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 2250, HD 2, SD 2
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 8, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 2250, H.D. 2, S.D. 2
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: April 14, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Third Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
^President of the Senate
Clerk of the Senate
3722